Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 14

Violence in the Workplace

20-14-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a continuity of purpose, including following or stalking an employee to or from the employee's place of work, entering the workplace of an employee, following an employee during hours of employment, telephone calls to an employee, and correspondence with an employee, including, but not limited to, the use of the public or private mails, interoffice mail, facsimile or computer e-mail;

“Credible threat of violence” means a knowing and willful statement or course of conduct that would cause a reasonable person to believe that the person is under threat of death or serious bodily injury and that is intended to, and that actually causes, a person to believe that the person is under threat of death or serious bodily injury;

“Employer” means any person or entity that employs one (1) or more employees and shall include the state and its political subdivisions and instrumentalities; and

[Deleted by 2011 amendment.]

“Unlawful violence” means assault, aggravated assault, stalking, intimidation, or extortion as prohibited by §§ 39-13-101, 39-13-102, 39-17-315, 39-17-309 and 39-14-112.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 2; 2011, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning laws related to violence in the workplace, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 315.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted the definition of “labor dispute” which read: “‘Labor dispute’ includes any controversy concerning terms or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether or not the disputants stand in the proximate relationship of employer and employee; and”; and rewrote the definition of “unlawful violence” which read: “‘Unlawful violence’ means assault, aggravated assault or stalking, as prohibited by §§39-13-101,39-13-102, and39-17-315, but shall not include lawful acts of self-defense or defense of others.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 315, § 7. May 27, 2011.

Comparative Legislation. Violence in the workplace:

Ark. Code § §11-5-115

Ga. O.C.G.A. § §34-6-1 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §97-23-41

20-14-102. Temporary restraining order and injunction.

Any employer or employee who has suffered unlawful violence or a credible threat of violence from any individual, or an organization that the individual is affiliated with, which can reasonably be construed to have been carried out at the workplace, may seek a temporary restraining order and an injunction prohibiting further unlawful violence or threats of violence by that individual, or the organization that individual is affiliated with, at the workplace. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing a court to issue a temporary restraining order or injunction prohibiting speech or other activities that are protected by the constitutions of this state or the United States.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 3; 2011, ch. 315, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning laws related to violence in the workplace, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 315.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section which read: “Any employer whose employee has suffered unlawful violence or a credible threat of violence from any individual, which can reasonably be construed to have been carried out at the employee's workplace, may seek a temporary restraining order and an injunction on behalf of the employer prohibiting further unlawful violence or threats of violence by that individual at the employee's workplace or while the employee is acting within the course and scope of employment with the employer. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing a court to issue a temporary restraining order or injunction prohibiting speech or other activities that are protected by the constitutions of Tennessee or the United States.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 315, § 7. May 27, 2011.

20-14-103. Jurisdiction.

Except for proceedings involving a nonresident respondent, the court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the unlawful violence or credible threat of violence occurred shall have jurisdiction over all proceedings under this chapter.

For proceedings under this chapter involving a nonresident respondent, the court of competent jurisdiction where the petitioner's workplace is located shall have jurisdiction, where the act involving unlawful violence or a credible threat of unlawful violence meets the elements for personal jurisdiction provided for under § 20-2-223(a)(3) or (a)(4).

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 4.

20-14-104. Petition — Affidavit — Duration of temporary restraining order.

Upon filing a petition with the court for an injunction pursuant to this chapter, the petitioner may obtain a temporary restraining order if the petitioner also files an affidavit that, to the satisfaction of the court, shows reasonable proof that an employee or employer has suffered unlawful violence or a credible threat of violence by the respondent and that great or irreparable harm will result to an employee or an employer if the injunction is not granted. The affidavit shall further show that the petitioner has conducted a reasonable investigation into the underlying facts that are the subject of the petition. A temporary restraining order granted under this chapter shall remain in effect, at the court's discretion, for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) days, unless otherwise modified or terminated by the court.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 5; 2011, ch. 315, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning laws related to violence in the workplace, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 315.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “or employer” and “or an employer” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 315, § 7. May 27, 2011.

20-14-105. Hearing on petition — Response — Relevant testimony — Duration of injunction — Renewal of injunction.

Within ten (10) days of the filing of the petition under this chapter or as soon as practical thereafter, but in no case later than thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, a hearing shall be held on the petition for the injunction. In the event a hearing cannot be scheduled within the county where the case is pending within the thirty-day period, it shall be scheduled and heard as soon as possible. The respondent may file a response that explains, excuses, justifies, or denies the alleged unlawful violence or credible threat of violence or may file a cross-complaint under this chapter. At the hearing, the judge shall receive any testimony that is relevant and may make an independent inquiry. If the judge finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent engaged in unlawful violence or made a credible threat of violence, an injunction shall be issued prohibiting further unlawful violence or threats of violence at the workplace or while the employee or employer is acting within the course and scope of employment. An injunction issued pursuant to this chapter shall have a duration of not more than three (3) years. At any time within the three-month period before the expiration of the injunction, the petitioner may apply for a renewal of the injunction by filing a new petition for an injunction pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 6; 2011, ch. 315, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning laws related to violence in the workplace, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 315.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in the fifth sentence, substituted “an injunction shall be issued” for “an injunction shall issue”, substituted “workplace” for “employee’s workplace” and substituted “the employee or employer is acting within the course and scope of employment” for “the employee is acting within the course and scope of employment with the employer” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 315, § 7. May 27, 2011.

20-14-106. Service of petition, temporary restraining order, and notice of hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for an injunction under this chapter, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the petition, temporary restraining order, if any, and notice of hearing on the petition.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 7.

20-14-107. Delivery of orders to law enforcement agencies — Availability of information to law enforcement officers.

The court shall order the petitioner or the attorney for the petitioner to deliver a copy of each temporary restraining order or injunction, or modification or termination of the temporary restraining order or injunction, granted under this chapter, by the close of the business day on which the order was granted, to the law enforcement agencies within the court's discretion as are requested by the petitioner. Each appropriate law enforcement agency shall make available information as to the existence and current status of these orders to law enforcement officers responding to the scene of reported unlawful violence or a credible threat of violence.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 8.

20-14-108. Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as expanding, diminishing, altering or modifying the duty, if any, of an employer to provide a safe workplace for employees and other persons. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an employer or employee from pursuing any other civil or criminal remedy provided by law.

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 9.

20-14-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 2002, ch. 541, § 10, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 315, § 6, effective May 27, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-14-109 concerned the applicability of the chapter to labor disputes.